South Dakota, session 2026, HB1115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-42-5 be AMENDED:
22-42-5. No person may knowingly possess a controlled drug or substance unless
the substance was obtained directly or pursuant to a valid prescription or order from a
practitioner, while acting in the course of the practitioner's professional practice or except
as otherwise authorized by chapter 34-20B. A charge for unauthorized possession of
controlled substance when absorbed into the human body as set forth in subdivision 22-
42-1(1) shall only be charged under the provisions of § 22-42-5.1. A violation of this
section for a substance in Schedules I or II is a Class 5 felony. A violation of this section
for a substance in Schedule III and IV is a Class 6 felony.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.